Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 827 Section 1. Section 321.178, subsection 2, paragraph 1 a, subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 2 subparagraph. 3 Sec. 2. Section 321.178, subsection 2, paragraphs b and c, 4 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 5 b. The department may suspend a restricted work license 6 issued under this subsection upon receiving satisfactory 7 evidence that the licensee has violated the restrictions 8 imposed under paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph 9 division (a). The department may also suspend a restricted 10 work license issued under this subsection upon receiving a 11 record of the personâs conviction for one violation and shall 12 revoke the license upon receiving a record of conviction 13 for two or more violations of a law of this state or a city 14 ordinance regulating the operation of motor vehicles on 15 highways, other than parking violations as described in section 16 321.210 . After revoking a restricted work license under this 17 paragraph, the department shall not grant an application for a 18 new driverâs license or instruction permit until the expiration 19 of one year or until the person attains the age of eighteen, 20 whichever is the longer period. 21 c. A person who violates the restrictions imposed under 22 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), 23 may be issued a citation under this section and shall not be 24 issued a citation under section 321.193 . A violation of the 25 restrictions imposed under paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), 26 subparagraph division (a), shall not be considered a moving 27 violation. 28 Sec. 3. Section 321.180B, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 29 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 b. The department may suspend an instruction permit, 31 intermediate license, or full license issued under this section 32 upon receiving satisfactory evidence that the person issued 33 the instruction permit, intermediate license, or full license 34 violated the restrictions imposed under subsection 1 , or 2 , or 35 -1- LSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 8 H.F. 827 6 during the term of the instruction permit or intermediate 1 license. 2 Sec. 4. Section 321.180B, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 3 amended by striking the subsection. 4 Sec. 5. Section 321.180B, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 7. Citations for violation of restrictions. A person who 7 violates the restrictions imposed under subsection 1 , or 2 , or 8 6 may be issued a citation under this section and shall not be 9 issued a citation under section 321.193 . A violation of the 10 restrictions imposed under subsection subsections 1 , and 2 , or 11 6 shall not be considered a moving violation. 12 Sec. 6. Section 321.194, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 13 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 14 Sec. 7. Section 321.210, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 15 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 16 Sec. 8. Section 321.238, Code 2025, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 321.238 Use of electronic devices while driving ââ preemption 19 of local legislation. 20 The provisions of this chapter restricting the use of 21 electronic communication devices and electronic entertainment 22 devices by motor vehicle operators shall be implemented 23 uniformly throughout the state. Such provisions shall preempt 24 any county or municipal ordinance regarding the use of an 25 electronic communication device or electronic entertainment 26 device by a motor vehicle operator. In addition, a county or 27 municipality shall not adopt or continue in effect an ordinance 28 regarding the use of an electronic communication device or 29 electronic entertainment device by a motor vehicle operator. 30 Sec. 9. Section 321.276, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 31 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 32 following: 33 1. For purposes of this section: 34 a. âElectronic deviceâ means a device that is powered by 35 -2- LSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns 2/ 8 H.F. 827 electricity, including by a battery, and that is capable of 1 being used to compose, send, receive, or read an electronic 2 message, or that is capable of storing, retrieving on-demand, 3 or displaying videos, movies, broadcast television images, 4 visual images, or audio or video data files. âElectronic 5 deviceâ includes but is not limited to a telephone including 6 a cellular telephone, personal digital assistant, portable 7 or mobile computer including a tablet, two-way messaging 8 device, electronic gaming device, and any substantially similar 9 portable device that is used to initiate, store, or receive 10 electronic communication, information, or data. âElectronic 11 deviceâ does not include a device that is physically or 12 electronically integrated into a motor vehicle, including but 13 not limited to an integrated global positioning system or 14 navigation system when the destination is entered into such 15 system before the vehicle is in motion. 16 b. âUseâ includes but is not limited to holding, viewing, or 17 manipulating an electronic device. 18 c. âVoice-activated or hands-free modeâ means an attachment, 19 accessory, application, wireless connection, or built-in 20 feature of an electronic device or motor vehicle that allows 21 a person to use verbal commands or a single touch to activate 22 or deactivate the device or a function or software application 23 of the device. âVoice-activated or hands-free modeâ does not 24 include accessing nonnavigation video content, engaging in a 25 video call, accessing or engaging in video streaming, accessing 26 gaming data, or reading an electronic message or notification. 27 Sec. 10. Section 321.276, subsections 2, 3, and 4, Code 28 2025, are amended to read as follows: 29 2. A person shall not use a hand-held an electronic 30 communication device to write, send, or view an electronic 31 message while driving a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle 32 is at a complete stop off the traveled portion of the roadway , 33 or as far away from the center of the roadway as is practicable 34 if the vehicle cannot be entirely removed from the traveled 35 -3- LSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns 3/ 8 H.F. 827 portion of the roadway . 1 a. A person does not violate this section by using a global 2 positioning system or navigation system or when, for the 3 purpose of engaging in a call, the person selects or enters a 4 telephone number or name in a hand-held mobile telephone or 5 activates, deactivates, or initiates a function of a hand-held 6 mobile telephone an electronic device in a voice-activated or 7 hands-free mode . 8 b. The provisions of this subsection relating to writing, 9 sending, or viewing an electronic message the use of an 10 electronic device do not apply to the following persons: 11 (1) A member of a public safety agency, as defined in 12 section 34.1 , performing official duties. 13 (2) A health care professional in the course of an emergency 14 situation. 15 (3) A person receiving safety-related information including 16 emergency , traffic, or weather alerts. 17 (4) A person using an electronic device for the purpose 18 of reporting an emergency situation, including any continued 19 communication with emergency personnel during the emergency 20 situation or public transit personnel responding to a 21 transit-specific situation. 22 (5) A person operating an implement of husbandry. 23 (6) A person using a two-way radio transmitter or receiver 24 who is licensed with the federal communications commission in 25 amateur radio service. 26 (7) A member of a public transit system, as defined in 27 section 324A.1, performing official duties while in a vehicle 28 that is not in motion. 29 (8) A utility maintenance employee or contractor using 30 an electronic device while in a utility maintenance vehicle, 31 for the purpose of providing utility services including 32 but not limited to cable, electric, natural gas, telephone, 33 telecommunication, water, and wastewater treatment services, 34 provided the employee or contractor is acting within the scope 35 -4- LSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns 4/ 8 H.F. 827 of their employment or agency. 1 (9) A transportation network company driver, as defined in 2 section 321N.1, while engaged in a prearranged ride, as defined 3 in section 321N.1, provided the vehicle is not in motion. 4 (10) A person using an electronic device for the purpose of 5 accessing or using a fleet management system. 6 3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize 7 a peace officer to confiscate a hand-held an electronic 8 communication device from the driver or occupant of a motor 9 vehicle. 10 4. a. A person convicted of a violation of this section 11 is guilty of a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled 12 violation under section 805.8A, subsection 14 , paragraph âlâ . 13 b. A violation of this section shall not be considered a 14 moving violation for purposes of this chapter or and rules 15 adopted pursuant to this chapter . 16 c. Notwithstanding paragraphs âaâ and âbâ , a peace officer 17 shall issue a warning memorandum in lieu of a citation to a 18 person for violating this section. This paragraph is repealed 19 January 1, 2026. 20 Sec. 11. Section 321.482A, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 21 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 Notwithstanding section 321.482 , a person who is convicted 23 of operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 321.178, 24 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), section 25 321.180B, subsection 6 , section 321.194, subsection 5 , 26 paragraph âdâ , section 321.256 , 321.257 , section 321.275, 27 subsection 4 , section 321.276 , 321.297 , 321.298 , 321.299 , 28 321.302 , 321.303 , 321.304 , 321.305 , 321.306 , 321.307 , 321.311 , 29 321.319 , 321.320 , 321.321 , 321.322 , 321.323 , 321.324 , 321.324A , 30 321.327 , 321.329 , 321.333 , section 321.372, subsection 3 , or 31 section 321.449B , causing serious injury to or the death of 32 another person may be subject to the following penalties in 33 addition to the penalty provided for a scheduled violation in 34 section 805.8A or any other penalty provided by law: 35 -5- LSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns 5/ 8 H.F. 827 Sec. 12. Section 321.555, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Six or more of any separate and distinct offenses within 3 a two-year period in the operation of a motor vehicle, which 4 are required to be reported to the department by section 5 321.491 or chapter 321C , except equipment violations, parking 6 violations as defined in section 321.210 , violations of 7 registration laws, violations of sections 321.445 and 321.446 , 8 violations of section 321.276 , operating a vehicle with an 9 expired license or permit, failure to appear, weights and 10 measures violations and speeding violations of less than 11 fifteen miles per hour over the legal speed limit. 12 Sec. 13. Section 707.6A, subsection 2, paragraph a, 13 subparagraphs (1), (2), and (3), Code 2025, are amended by 14 striking the subparagraphs and inserting in lieu thereof the 15 following: 16 (1) For purposes of this paragraph âaâ , a personâs use of 17 an electronic device while driving a motor vehicle shall be 18 considered prima facie evidence that the person was driving 19 the motor vehicle in a reckless manner with willful or wanton 20 disregard for the safety of persons or property, in violation 21 of section 321.277. 22 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to any of the following: 23 (a) A person using an electronic device in a voice-activated 24 or hands-free mode. 25 (b) A person listed in section 321.276, subsection 2, 26 paragraph âbâ . 27 (3) For purposes of this paragraph âaâ , the following 28 definitions apply: 29 (a) âElectronic deviceâ means the same as defined in section 30 321.276. 31 (b) âUseâ means the same as defined in section 321.276. 32 (c) âVoice-activated or hands-free modeâ means the same as 33 defined in section 321.276. 34 Sec. 14. Section 805.8A, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 35 -6- LSB 1610HV (2) 91 th/ns 6/ 8 H.F. 827 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 1 Sec. 15. Section 805.8A, subsection 14, paragraph l, Code 2 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 l. Writing, sending, or viewing an Use of electronic message 4 device while driving violations. For violations under section 5 321.276 , the scheduled fine is forty-five one hundred dollars. 6